Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201013-3001
Peace officer; production or disclosure
of personal financial records; restrictions.

After an applicant is hired by any municipality
or county as a peace officer, no municipality or county may require the peace
officer to produce or disclose the peace officer's personal financial records
except pursuant to a valid search warrant or subpoena. This section does not
apply to any municipality or county accredited through the Commission on Accreditation
for Law Enforcement Agencies.

Laws 2009, LB158, § 4.